Hawaii, session 2026, SB2397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d) A quorum for a meeting of a neighborhood board or community outreach board shall be required for: (1)  Conducting official board business; (2)  Discussions before and related to voting; and (3)  Voting required to validate an act of the board as part of official board business[.]; provided that if a neighborhood board overseen by a neighborhood commission of the city and county of Honolulu has a vacancy, notwithstanding section 92-15, only a majority of all seats on the neighborhood board that are filled shall constitute a quorum to conduct official board business and discussion before and related to voting and the concurrence of a majority of all members present at a meeting at which quorum is established shall be necessary to make any act of the board as part of official board business valid. A neighborhood board or community outreach board may receive information or testimony on a matter of official board business without a quorum; provided that the board shall not make a decision on the issue.  The board members, at the next meeting of the board, shall report the matters presented as information or testimony." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________